Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-158
Compensation; payment.

Whenever a member of the military forces of the State of Nebraska is entitled to compensation as provided in section 55-157, the Adjutant General shall certify the amount of compensation to be paid and direct that the warrant shall be charged against the state appropriated funds of the military department.

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 56, p. 1599.